Massachusetts, session 194th, H3308.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Pursuant to chapter 65 of the acts of 2010 and notwithstanding section 5A of
chapter 3 of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the
commissioner of conservation and recreation, may lease or enter into other agreements with
Riverside Boat Club of Cambridge in the city of Cambridge, for a reconfigured parcel of land for
the continued operation of its historical rowing program and boathouse. The parcel of land is
more particularly described on a plan of land, on file with the department of conservation and
recreation, entitled “Plan Showing Reoriented Boundary for Riverside Boat Club of Cambridge”,
of 2

revised July 29, 2024, including adjacent water sheet currently being used and shall include
appurtenant rights of access from adjoining public roadways.
Section 2. The commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may: (i)
make minor revisions to the plan pursuant to Section 1 and shall file the final plan with the
Middlesex southern district registry of deeds; and (ii) execute any leases or other agreements
consistent with said chapter 65.
of 2